Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,118
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-2,111 to 76-2,118 shall be known and may be cited as the Conservation and Preservation Easements Act.

Laws 1981, LB 173, § 8.